Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2488.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 169
BAIL BOND AGENTS AND BAIL BOND RECOVERY AGENTS
42-169-1. Unprofessional conduct -- Civil immigration enforcement prohibited.
In addition to any other acts constituting unprofessional conduct under Rhode Island law
or regulation, the following conduct by a bail bond agent or bail bond recovery agent shall
constitute unprofessional conduct:
(1) Using the authority, position, or resources of a bail bond agent or bail bond recovery
agent to engage in civil immigration enforcement.
(2) Assisting, facilitating, or participating in the enforcement of a civil immigration
warrant, detainer, administrative warrant, or other civil immigration process issued by a federal
immigration authority.
(3) Knowingly inquiring into, collecting, disclosing, or sharing information regarding a
defendant’s or third party’s actual or perceived immigration or citizenship status, except where
required by law or pursuant to a court order.
42-169-2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter, “Civil immigration enforcement” means any action taken

for the purpose of detecting, apprehending, detaining, transferring, or assisting in the removal of
an individual based solely on an alleged violation of federal civil immigration law and not pursuant
to a criminal warrant issued by a judicial officer.
42-169-3. Savings clause.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a bail bond agent or bail bond
recovery agent from apprehending a defendant pursuant to a valid criminal warrant, court order, or
contractual obligation related to bail; provided that, such action is not undertaken for the purpose
of civil immigration enforcement.
42-169-4. Discipline and enforcement.
A violation of this chapter shall subject a bail bond agent or bail bond recovery agent to
discipline by the appropriate licensing or regulatory authority including, but not limited to, license
suspension, revocation, denial of renewal, or the imposition of civil penalties, in accordance with
applicable law.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004343
========
LC004343 - Page 2 of 3